Missouri, session 2026, HB2124.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 116.030, 116.040, 116.050, 116.080, 116.090, 116.110, 116.130,
116.153, 116.190, 116.200, 116.332, and 116.334, RSMo, are repealed and twelve new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 116.030, 116.040, 116.045, 116.050,
116.080, 116.090, 116.110, 116.130, 116.190, 116.200, 116.332, and 116.334, to read as
follows:
116.030. The following shall be substantially the form of each page of referendum
petitions on any law passed by the general assembly of the state of Missouri:
County ______
Page No. ______
It is a class A misdemeanor punishable, notwithstanding the provisions
of section [560.021] 558.002, RSMo, to the contrary, for a term of
imprisonment not to exceed one year in the county jail or a fine not to
exceed ten thousand dollars or both, for anyone to sign any referendum
petition with any name other than his or her own, or knowingly to sign
his or her name more than once for the same measure for the same
election, or to sign a petition when such person knows he or she is not a
registered voter.
PETITION FOR REFERENDUM
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2124 2
To the Honorable ______, Secretary of State for the state of Missouri:
We, the undersigned, registered voters of the state of Missouri and ___
___ County (or City of St. Louis), respectfully order that the Senate (or
House) Bill No. ______ entitled (title of law), passed by the ______
general assembly of the state of Missouri, at the ______ regular (or
special) session of the ______ general assembly, shall be referred to the
voters of the state of Missouri, for their approval or rejection, at the
general election to be held on the ______ day of ______, ______,
unless the general assembly shall designate another date, and each for
himself or herself says: I have personally signed this petition; I am a
registered voter of the state of Missouri and ______ County (or City of
St. Louis); my registered voting address and the name of the city, town
or village in which I live are correctly written after my name.
(Official Ballot title) ______
CIRCULATOR'S AFFIDAVIT
State Of Missouri,
County Of ______
I, ______, being first duly sworn, say (print or type names of signers)
REGISTERED
DATE VOTING ZIP CONGR.
NAME SIGNED ADDRESS CODE DIST. NAME
(Signature) (Street) (City, (Printed or
Town or Village) Typed)
(Here follow numbered lines for signers)
signed this page of the foregoing petition, and each of them signed his
or her name thereto in my presence; I believe that each has stated his or
her name, registered voting address and city, town or village correctly,
and that each signer is a registered voter of the state of Missouri and __
____ County. FURTHERMORE, I HEREBY SWEAR OR AFFIRM
UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY THAT ALL STATEMENTS
MADE BY ME ARE TRUE AND CORRECT AND THAT I HAVE
NEVER BEEN CONVICTED OF, FOUND GUILTY OF, OR PLED
GUILTY TO ANY OFFENSE INVOLVING FORGERY.
I have met the qualifications of section 116.080 and am at least 18
years of age. I do ______ do not ______ (check one) expect to be paid
for circulating this petition. If paid, list the payer ______

HB 2124 3
_______________
Signature of Affiant
(Person obtaining signatures)
_______________
(Printed Name of Affiant)
_______________
Address of Affiant
Subscribed and sworn to before me this ______ day of ______, A.D. _
_____
_______________
Signature of Notary
Address of Notary
Notary Public (Seal)
My commission expires ______

If this form is followed substantially and the requirements of [section] sections 116.045,
116.050, and [section] 116.080 are met, it shall be sufficient, disregarding clerical and merely
technical errors.
116.040. The following shall be substantially the form of each page of each petition
for any law or amendment to the Constitution of the state of Missouri proposed by the
initiative:
County ______
(Optional) Page No. ______
It is a class A misdemeanor punishable, notwithstanding the provisions
of section [560.021] 558.002, RSMo, to the contrary, for a term of
imprisonment not to exceed one year in the county jail or a fine not to
exceed ten thousand dollars or both, for anyone to sign any initiative
petition with any name other than his or her own, or knowingly to sign
his or her name more than once for the same measure for the same
election, or to sign a petition when such person knows he or she is not a
registered voter.
INITIATIVE PETITION
To the Honorable ______, Secretary of State for the state of Missouri:
We, the undersigned, registered voters of the state of Missouri and ___
___ County (or City of St. Louis), respectfully order that the following
proposed law (or amendment to the constitution) shall be submitted to

HB 2124 4
the voters of the state of Missouri, for their approval or rejection, at the
general election to be held on the ______ day of ______, ______, and
each for himself or herself says: I have personally signed this petition; I
am a registered voter of the state of Missouri and ______ County (or
City of St. Louis); my registered voting address and the name of the
city, town or village in which I live are correctly written after my name.
(Official Ballot title) ______
CIRCULATOR'S AFFIDAVIT
State Of Missouri,
County Of ______
I, ______, being first duly sworn, say (print or type names of signers)
REGISTERED
DATE VOTING ZIP CONGR.
NAME SIGNED ADDRESS CODE DIST. NAME
(Signature) (Street) (City, (Printed or
Town or
Village) Typed)
(Here follow numbered lines for signers)
signed this page of the foregoing petition, and each of them signed his
or her name thereto in my presence; I believe that each has stated his or
her name, registered voting address and city, town or village correctly,
and that each signer is a registered voter of the state of Missouri and __
____ County.
FURTHERMORE, I HEREBY SWEAR OR AFFIRM UNDER
PENALTY OF PERJURY THAT ALL STATEMENTS MADE BY ME
ARE TRUE AND CORRECT AND THAT I HAVE NEVER BEEN
CONVICTED OF, FOUND GUILTY OF, OR PLED GUILTY TO
ANY OFFENSE INVOLVING FORGERY.
I have met the qualifications of section 116.080 and am at least 18
years of age. I do ______ do not ______ (check one) expect to be paid
for circulating this petition. If paid, list the payer ______
_______________
Signature of Affiant
(Person obtaining signatures)
_______________
(Printed Name of Affiant)

HB 2124 5
_______________
Address of Affiant
Subscribed and sworn to before me this ______ day of ______, A.D. _
_____
_______________
Signature of Notary
Address of Notary
Notary Public (Seal)
My commission expires ______

If this form is followed substantially and the requirements of [section] sections 116.045,
116.050, and [section] 116.080 are met, it shall be sufficient, disregarding clerical and merely
technical errors.
116.045. Initiative petition and referendum petition signature pages shall be
printed on a form as prescribed by the secretary of state that shall include all of the
information and statements required by section 116.030 or 116.040, as applicable, and
comply with section 116.050. The form shall be made available in electronic format to
be used for printing petitions for circulating.
116.050. 1. Initiative and referendum petitions filed under the provisions of this
chapter shall consist of pages of a uniform size. Each page, excluding the text of the measure,
shall be no larger than eight and one-half by fourteen inches. The text of the proposed
measure shall be in a font that is not smaller than twelve-point Times New Roman and
have a top, bottom, left, and right margin of not less than one inch. Page numbers may
appear in the bottom margin. Each page of an initiative petition shall be attached to or shall
contain a full and correct text of the proposed measure. Each page of a referendum petition
shall be attached to or shall contain a full and correct text of the measure on which the
referendum is sought.
2. The full and correct text of all initiative and referendum petition measures shall:
(1) Contain all matter which is to be deleted included in its proper place enclosed in
brackets and all new matter shown underlined;
(2) Include all sections of existing law or of the constitution which would be repealed
by the measure; and
(3) Otherwise conform to the provisions of [Article III, Section 28 and] Article III,
[Section] Sections 28, 49, 50, 51, and 52(a) of the Constitution of Missouri and those of this
chapter.

HB 2124 6
116.080. 1. Each petition circulator shall be a citizen of the United States, [at least]
eighteen years of age or older, a resident of this state or physically present in this state for
at least thirty consecutive days prior to the collection of signatures, and registered with
the secretary of state. No petition circulator shall be paid anything of value that is based
on the number of signatures collected. Signatures collected by any circulator who has not
registered with the secretary of state pursuant to this chapter on or before 5:00 p.m. on the
final day for filing petitions with the secretary of state shall not be counted. A petition
circulator shall be deemed registered at the time such circulator delivers a signed circulator's
affidavit pursuant to section 116.030, with respect to a referendum petition, or section
116.040, with respect to an initiative petition, to the office of the secretary of state. No person
shall qualify as a petition circulator who has been convicted of, found guilty of, or pled guilty
to an offense involving forgery under the laws of this state or an offense under the laws of any
other jurisdiction if that offense would be considered forgery under the laws of this state.
2. Each petition circulator shall subscribe and swear to the proper affidavit on each
petition page such circulator submits before a notary public commissioned in Missouri.
When notarizing a circulator's signature, a notary public shall sign his or her official signature
and affix his or her official seal to the affidavit only if the circulator personally appears before
the notary and subscribes and swears to the affidavit in his or her presence.
3. Any circulator who falsely swears to a circulator's affidavit knowing it to be false is
guilty of a class A misdemeanor punishable, notwithstanding the provisions of section
[560.021] 558.002 to the contrary, for a term of imprisonment not to exceed one year in the
county jail or a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars or both.
116.090. 1. Any person who commits any of the following actions is guilty of the
crime of petition signature fraud:
(1) Signs any name other than his or her own to any petition, or who knowingly signs
his or her name more than once for the same measure for the same election, or who knows he
or she is not at the time of signing or circulating the same a Missouri registered voter and a
resident of this state; [or]
(2) Intentionally submits petition signature sheets with the knowledge that the person
whose name appears on the signature sheet did not actually sign the petition; [or]
(3) Causes a voter to sign a petition other than the one the voter intended to sign; [or]
(4) Forges or falsifies signatures; or
(5) Knowingly accepts or offers money or anything of value to another person in
exchange for a signature on a petition.
2. Any person who knowingly causes a petition circulator's signatures to be submitted
for counting, and who either knows that such circulator has violated subsection 1 of this
section or, after receiving notice of facts indicating that such person may have violated

HB 2124 7
subsection 1 of this section, causes the signatures to be submitted with reckless indifference
as to whether such circulator has complied with subsection 1 of this section, shall also be
deemed to have committed the crime of petition signature fraud.
3. A person who violates subsection 1 or 2 of this section, shall, upon conviction
thereof, be guilty of a class A misdemeanor punishable, notwithstanding the provisions of
section [560.021] 558.002 to the contrary, by a term of imprisonment not to exceed one year
in the county jail or a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars or both.
4. Any person employed by or serving as an election authority, that has reasonable
cause to suspect a person has committed petition signature fraud, shall immediately report or
cause a report to be made to the appropriate prosecuting authorities. Failure to so report or
cause a report to be made shall be a class A misdemeanor.
116.110. Any voter who has signed an initiative or referendum petition may withdraw
his or her signature from that petition by submitting to the secretary of state, before the
petition is filed with the secretary of state, a sworn statement requesting that his or her
signature be withdrawn and affirming the name of the petition signed, the name the voter used
when signing the petition, the address of the voter and the county of residence. It is a class A
misdemeanor punishable, notwithstanding the provisions of section [560.021] 558.002 to the
contrary, for a term of imprisonment not to exceed one year in the county jail or a fine not to
exceed ten thousand dollars or both, to knowingly file a false withdrawal statement with the
secretary of state.
116.130. 1. The secretary of state may send copies of petition pages to election
authorities to verify that the persons whose names are listed as signers to the petition are
registered voters. Such verification may either be of each signature or by random sampling as
provided in section 116.120, as the secretary shall direct. If copies of the petition pages are
sent to an election authority for verification, such copies shall be sent pursuant to the
following schedule:
(1) Copies of all pages from not less than one petition shall be received in the office
of the election authority not later than two weeks after the petition is filed in the office of the
secretary of state;
(2) Copies of all pages of a total of three petitions shall be received in the office of the
election authority not later than three weeks after the petition is filed in the office of the
secretary of state;
(3) If more than three petitions are filed, all copies of petition pages, including those
petitions selected for verification by random sample pursuant to section 116.120, shall be
received in the office of the election authority not later than the fourth week after the petition
is filed in the office of the secretary of state.


HB 2124 8
Each election authority shall check the signatures against voter registration records in the
election authority's jurisdiction, but the election authority shall count as valid only the
signatures of persons registered as voters in the county named in the circulator's affidavit.
Signatures shall not be counted as valid if they have been struck through or crossed out.
Signatures shall be recorded using a black or dark ink.
2. If the election authority is requested to verify the petition by random sampling,
such verification shall be completed and certified not later than thirty days from the date that
the election authority receives the petition from the secretary of state. If the election authority
is to verify each signature, such verification [must] shall be completed, certified and
delivered to the secretary of state by 5:00 p.m. on the last Tuesday in July prior to the
election, or in the event of complete verification of signatures after a failed random sample,
full verification shall be completed, certified and delivered to the secretary of state by 5:00
p.m. on the last Tuesday in July or by 5:00 p.m. on the Friday of the fifth week after receipt
of the signatures by the local election authority, whichever is later.
3. If the election authority or the secretary of state determines that the congressional
district number written after the signature of any voter is not the congressional district of
which the voter is a resident, the election authority or the secretary of state shall correct the
congressional district number on the petition page. Failure of a voter to give the voter's
correct congressional district number shall not by itself be grounds for not counting the voter's
signature.
4. The election authority shall return the copies of the petition pages to the secretary
of state with annotations regarding any invalid or questionable signatures which the election
authority has been asked to check by the secretary of state. The election authority shall verify
the number of pages received for that county, and also certify the total number of valid
signatures of voters from each congressional district which the election authority has been
asked to check by the secretary of state.
5. The secretary of state is authorized to adopt rules to ensure uniform, complete, and
accurate checking of petition signatures either by actual count or random sampling. No rule
or portion of a rule promulgated pursuant to this section shall become effective unless it has
been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of chapter 536.
6. After a period of three years from the time of submission of the petitions to the
secretary of state, the secretary of state, if the secretary determines that retention of such
petitions is no longer necessary, may destroy such petitions.
116.190. 1. Any [citizen] Missouri registered voter who wishes to challenge the
official ballot title or the fiscal note prepared for a proposed constitutional amendment
submitted by the general assembly, by initiative petition, or by constitutional convention, or
for a statutory initiative or referendum measure, may bring an action in the circuit court of

HB 2124 9
Cole County. The action shall be brought within ten days after the official ballot title is
certified by the secretary of state in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, in the case
of an initiative petition and not later than the twenty-second Tuesday prior to the general
election at which the ballot measure will be submitted to the voters, in the case of all other
statewide ballot measures.
2. The secretary of state shall be named as a party defendant in any action challenging
the official ballot title prepared by the secretary of state. When the action challenges the
fiscal note or the fiscal note summary prepared by the auditor, the state auditor shall also be
named as a party defendant. The president pro tem of the senate, the speaker of the house and
the sponsor of the measure and the secretary of state shall be the named party defendants in
any action challenging the official summary statement, fiscal note or fiscal note summary
prepared pursuant to section 116.155.
3. The petition shall state the reason or reasons why the summary statement portion of
the official ballot title is insufficient or unfair. Alternatively, the petition shall state the
reasons why the fiscal note or the fiscal note summary portion of the official ballot title is
insufficient or unfair and shall request a different fiscal note or fiscal note summary portion of
the official ballot title.
4. (1) The action shall be placed at the top of the civil docket.
(2) (a) Insofar as the action challenges the summary statement portion of the official
ballot title, the court shall consider the petition, hear arguments, and in its decision certify the
summary statement portion of the official ballot title to the secretary of state as originally
written if the court finds the summary statement to be sufficient and fair. If the court finds the
summary statement to be insufficient or unfair, the court may offer suggested revisions for the
summary statement to remedy the legal flaws, but it shall, in its decision, order the secretary
of state to write a first revised summary statement that is sufficient and fair.
(b) The secretary of state shall submit a first revised summary statement to the court
within seven days. If, after submission to the court of a first revised summary statement by
the secretary of state, the court finds the first revised summary statement to be sufficient and
fair, the court shall certify to the secretary of state that statement and order it to appear on the
ballot. If the court finds the first revised summary statement to be insufficient or unfair, the
court may offer suggested revisions for the statement to remedy the legal flaws, but it shall, in
its decision, order the secretary of state to write a second revised summary statement that is
sufficient and fair.
(c) The secretary of state shall submit a second revised summary statement to the
court within five days. If, after submission to the court of a second revised summary
statement by the secretary of state, the court finds the second revised summary statement to
be sufficient and fair, the court shall certify to the secretary of state that statement and order it

HB 2124 10
to appear on the ballot. If the court finds the second revised summary statement to be
insufficient or unfair, the court may offer suggested revisions for the statement to remedy the
legal flaws, but it shall, in its decision, order the secretary of state to write a third revised
summary statement that is sufficient and fair.
(d) The secretary of state shall submit a third revised summary statement to the court
within three days. If, after submission to the court of a third revised summary statement by
the secretary of state, the court finds the third revised summary statement to be sufficient and
fair, the court shall certify to the secretary of state that statement and order it to appear on the
ballot. If the court finds the third revised summary statement to be insufficient or unfair, or if
the secretary of state neglects or refuses to submit any of the revised summary statements
within the times mandated by this subdivision when so ordered, the court shall revise the
summary statement in a manner that is sufficient and fair and order the secretary of state to
place that summary statement on the ballot with the measure.
(e) During all revisions as provided in this subdivision, the case shall remain open.
(f) Any nonprevailing party may make appeals as provided by law only following:
a. The finding of the circuit court that a summary statement was sufficient and fair; or
b. The circuit court ordering its own summary statement to be placed on the ballot
pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subdivision.
(g) Any action brought pursuant to this section challenging a statewide ballot measure
appearing on the ballot at an election called by the governor pursuant to Article XII, Section 2
(b), Missouri Constitution, whether at the primary election or at a special election, or at a
special election for a referendum petition measure called by the general assembly pursuant to
Article III, Section 52(b), Missouri Constitution, shall be expedited by the court to bring a
resolution of the matter prior to the printing of ballots. The court may shorten any timeframe
under this section to achieve this purpose.
(3) Insofar as the action challenges the fiscal note or the fiscal note summary portion
of the official ballot title, the court shall consider the petition, hear arguments, and in its
decision, either certify the fiscal note or the fiscal note summary portion of the official ballot
title to the secretary of state or remand the fiscal note or the fiscal note summary to the auditor
for preparation of a new fiscal note or fiscal note summary pursuant to the procedures set
forth in section 116.175. Any party to the suit may appeal [to the supreme court] within ten
days after [a circuit court decision]the entry of the judgment by the circuit court pursuant
to this subdivision.
5. Any action brought under this section that is not fully and finally adjudicated
within one hundred eighty days of filing, and more than seventy days prior to the election in
which the measure is to appear, including all appeals, shall be extinguished, unless a court,
before the expiration of the foregoing periods, extends such period upon [a] an express

HB 2124 11
finding of good cause for such extension, but no extension shall cause the final
adjudication to occur less than eight weeks before the date of the election. Such good
cause shall consist only of court-related scheduling issues and shall not include requests for
continuance by the parties. No court, including any appellate court, shall have the
authority to issue any form of relief after the expiration of the foregoing periods.
116.200. 1. After the secretary of state certifies a petition as sufficient or insufficient,
any [citizen] Missouri registered voter may apply to the circuit court of Cole County to
compel [him] the secretary of state to reverse his or her decision. The action must be
brought within ten days after the certification is made. All such suits shall be advanced on the
court docket and heard and decided by the court as quickly as possible.
2. If the court decides the petition is sufficient, the secretary of state shall certify it as
sufficient and attach a copy of the judgment. If the court decides the petition is insufficient,
the court shall enjoin the secretary of state from certifying the measure and all other officers
from printing the measure on the ballot.
3. Any party may appealwithin ten days after [a decision is rendered, any party may
appeal it to the supreme court] the entry of the judgment by the circuit court.
116.332. 1. Before a constitutional amendment petition, a statutory initiative petition,
or a referendum petition may be circulated for signatures, a sample sheet [must] shall be
submitted to the secretary of state in the form in which it will be circulated. Sample sheets
may be submitted to the secretary of state any time after a general election until six
months prior to the next general election. When a person submits a sample sheet of a
petition he or she shall designate to the secretary of state the name and address of the person
to whom any notices shall be sent pursuant to sections 116.140 and 116.180 and, if a
committee or person, except the individual submitting the sample sheet, is funding any
portion of the drafting or submitting of the sample sheet, the person submitting the sample
sheet shall submit a copy of the filed statement of committee organization required under
subsection 5 of section 130.021 showing the date the statement was filed. The secretary of
state shall refer a copy of the petition sheet to the attorney general for his approval and to the
state auditor for purposes of preparing a fiscal note and fiscal note summary. The secretary of
state and attorney general [must] shall each review the petition for [sufficiency as to form]
compliance with section 116.050 and Article III, Sections 28, 49, 50, 51, and 52(a) of the
Constitution of Missouri and approve or reject the form of the petition, stating the reasons
for rejection, if any.
2. Within two business days of receipt of any such sample sheet, the office of the
secretary of state shall conspicuously post on its website the text of the proposed measure, a
disclaimer stating that such text may not constitute the full and correct text as required under
section 116.050, and the name of the person or organization submitting the sample sheet. The

HB 2124 12
secretary of state's failure to comply with such posting shall be considered a violation of
chapter 610 and subject to the penalties provided under subsection 3 of section 610.027. The
posting shall be removed within three days of either the withdrawal of the petition under
section 116.115 or the rejection for any reason of the petition.
3. Upon receipt of a petition from the office of the secretary of state, the attorney
general shall examine the petition [as to form] and determine whether it complies with
section 116.050 and Article III, Sections 28, 49, 50, 51, and 52(a) of the Constitution of
Missouri. If the petition is rejected [as to form], the attorney general shall forward his or her
comments to the secretary of state within ten days after receipt of the petition by the attorney
general. If the petition is approved [as to form], the attorney general shall forward his or her
approval [as to form] to the secretary of state within ten days after receipt of the petition by
the attorney general.
4. The secretary of state shall review the comments and statements of the attorney
general [as to form] and make a final decision as to the approval or rejection [of the form] of
the petition. The secretary of state shall send written notice to the person who submitted the
petition sheet of the approval within fifteen days after submission of the petition sheet. The
secretary of state shall send written notice if the petition has been rejected, together with
reasons for rejection, within fifteen days after submission of the petition sheet.
116.334. 1. If the petition [form] is approved under section 116.332, the secretary of
state shall make a copy of the sample petition available on the secretary of state's website.
For a period of fifteen days after the petition is approved [as to form] under section 116.332,
the secretary of state shall accept public comments regarding the proposed measure and
provide copies of such comments upon request. Within twenty-three days of receipt of such
approval, the secretary of state shall prepare and transmit to the attorney general a summary
statement of the measure which shall be a concise statement not exceeding one hundred
words. This statement shall [be in the form of a question using] use language neither
intentionally argumentative nor likely to create prejudice either for or against the proposed
measure. The attorney general shall within ten days approve the legal content and form of the
proposed statement.
2. Signatures obtained prior to the date the official ballot title is certified by the
secretary of state shall not be counted. Once the secretary of state certifies the official ballot
title, signatures may be collected, even if the ballot title is subject to an action in court
challenging the sufficiency and fairness of the ballot title. If a court orders a change that
alters the content of the official ballot title, then all signatures gathered before such change
occurred shall not be invalidated based upon the fact that one or more signatures were
gathered prior to the alteration of the official ballot title, regardless of whether those
signatures were gathered on petition pages that displayed what was previously the official

HB 2124 13
ballot title as certified by the secretary of state. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the
invalidation of a signature for a reason otherwise allowed by this chapter.
3. Signatures for statutory initiative petitions shall be filed not later than six months
prior to the general election during which the petition's ballot measure is submitted for a vote,
and shall also be collected not earlier than the day after the day upon which the previous
general election was held.
[116.153. Within thirty days of issuing certification that the petition
contains a sufficient number of valid signatures pursuant to section 116.150,
the joint committee on legislative research shall hold a public hearing in
Jefferson City to take public comments concerning the proposed measure.
Such hearing shall be a public meeting under chapter 610. Within five
business days after the end of the public hearing, the joint committee on
legislative research shall provide a summary of the hearing to the secretary of
state or his or her designee and the secretary of state shall post a copy of the
summary on the website of the office of the secretary of state.]
✔